Utah statutes.
53-7-313.   Removal of LPG containers -- Reasonableness of rates.
(1)  Rates charged for removal of leased LPG containers shall be reasonable.
(2)  The lessor of an LPG container shall credit the lessee's account the
current retail price for the amount of LPG remaining in the leased container
at the time the container is removed.
